Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-3708
Occupancy,
defined.

Occupancy means the
use or possession or
the right to the use or possession of
any space in a hotel if the space is one ordinarily used for accommodations
and if the occupant's use, possession, or right to the use or possession is
for less than a period of thirty days.

Laws 1980, LB 499, § 5;

Laws 1995, LB 134, § 7;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 81-1249;

Laws 2012, LB1053, § 8.